src/main/resources/bg_BG.aff
SET microsoft-cp1251
TRY аеноиртвслкмпздяубъчгцжхшфйщюьАЕНОИРТВСЛКМПЗДЯУБЪЧГЦЖХШФЙЩЮЬ

SFX A Y 8
SFX A   0         а         .
SFX A   0         ата       .
SFX A   0         и         .
SFX A   0         ите       .
SFX A   0         ия        .
SFX A   0         ият       .
SFX A   0         о         .
SFX A   0         ото       .

SFX B Y 3
SFX B   0         и         .
SFX B   0         ите       .
SFX B   0         та        .

SFX C Y 4
SFX C   0         а         .
SFX C   0         и         .
SFX C   0         ите       .
SFX C   0         ът        .

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0         а         .
SFX D   0         ове       .
SFX D   0         овете     .
SFX D   0         ът        .

SFX E Y 5
SFX E   0         и         .
SFX E   0         ите       .
SFX E   0         ю         .
SFX E   0         я         .
SFX E   0         ят        .

SFX F Y 5
SFX F   0         а         .
SFX F   0         е         .
SFX F   0         и         .
SFX F   0         ите       .
SFX F   0         ът        .

SFX G Y 5
SFX G   0         а         .
SFX G   0         и         .
SFX G   0         ите       .
SFX G   0         о         .
SFX G   0         ът        .

SFX H Y 4
SFX H   0         и         .
SFX H   0         ите       .
SFX H   0         я         .
SFX H   0         ят        .

SFX I Y 2
SFX I   0         а         .
SFX I   0         ът        .

SFX J Y 3
SFX J   0         та        .
SFX J   0         тата      .
SFX J   0         то        .

SFX K Y 25
SFX K   а         ата       .
SFX K   а         и         .
SFX K   а         ите       .
SFX K   г         га        .
SFX K   г         гът       .
SFX K   г         зи        .
SFX K   г         зите      .
SFX K   ен        на        .
SFX K   ен        ната      .
SFX K   ен        ни        .
SFX K   ен        ните      .
SFX K   ен        ния       .
SFX K   ен        ният      .
SFX K   ен        но        .
SFX K   ен        ното      .
SFX K   и         а         .
SFX K   и         ата       .
SFX K   и         ите       .
SFX K   и         ия        .
SFX K   и         ият       .
SFX K   и         о         .
SFX K   и         ото       .
SFX K   я         и         .
SFX K   я         ите       .
SFX K   я         ята       .

SFX L Y 133
SFX L   а         ата       .
SFX L   а         и         .
SFX L   а         ите       .
SFX L   е         ето       .
SFX L   ен        йна       .
SFX L   ен        йната     .
SFX L   ен        йни       .
SFX L   ен        йните     .
SFX L   ен        йния      .
SFX L   ен        йният     .
SFX L   ен        йно       .
SFX L   ен        йното     .
SFX L   ец        еца       .
SFX L   ец        ецо       .
SFX L   ец        ецът      .
SFX L   ец        ци        .
SFX L   ец        ците      .
SFX L   е         я         .
SFX L   е         ята       .
SFX L   и         а         .
SFX L   и         ата       .
SFX L   и         ите       .
SFX L   и         ия        .
SFX L   и         ият       .
SFX L   и         о         .
SFX L   и         ото       .
SFX L   о         а         .
SFX L   о         ата       .
SFX L   о         ото       .
SFX L   ъв        ва        .
SFX L   ъв        вата      .
SFX L   ъв        ви        .
SFX L   ъв        вите      .
SFX L   ъв        вия       .
SFX L   ъв        вият      .
SFX L   ъв        во        .
SFX L   ъв        вото      .
SFX L   ъг        га        .
SFX L   ъг        гата      .
SFX L   ъг        ги        .
SFX L   ъг        гите      .
SFX L   ъг        гия       .
SFX L   ъг        гият      .
SFX L   ъг        го        .
SFX L   ъг        гото      .
SFX L   ък        ка        .
SFX L   ък        ката      .
SFX L   ък        ки        .
SFX L   ък        ките      .
SFX L   ък        кия       .
SFX L   ък        кият      .
SFX L   ък        ко        .
SFX L   ък        кото      .
SFX L   ъл        ла        .
SFX L   ъл        лата      .
SFX L   ъл        ли        .
SFX L   ъл        лите      .
SFX L   ъл        лия       .
SFX L   ъл        лият      .
SFX L   ъл        ло        .
SFX L   ъл        лото      .
SFX L   ър        ра        .
SFX L   ър        рата      .
SFX L   ър        ри        .
SFX L   ър        рите      .
SFX L   ър        рия       .
SFX L   ър        рият      .
SFX L   ър        ро        .
SFX L   ър        рото      .
SFX L   ъш        ша        .
SFX L   ъш        шата      .
SFX L   ъш        ши        .
SFX L   ъш        шите      .
SFX L   ъш        шия       .
SFX L   ъш        шият      .
SFX L   ъш        шо        .
SFX L   ъш        шото      .
SFX L   яв        еви       .
SFX L   яв        евите     .
SFX L   яв        евия      .
SFX L   яв        евият     .
SFX L   яв        ява       .
SFX L   яв        явата     .
SFX L   яв        яво       .
SFX L   яв        явото     .
SFX L   як        еки       .
SFX L   як        еките     .
SFX L   як        екия      .
SFX L   як        екият     .
SFX L   як        яка       .
SFX L   як        яката     .
SFX L   як        яко       .
SFX L   як        якото     .
SFX L   ял        ели       .
SFX L   ял        елите     .
SFX L   ял        елия      .
SFX L   ял        елият     .
SFX L   ял        яла       .
SFX L   ял        ялата     .
SFX L   ял        яло       .
SFX L   ял        ялото     .
SFX L   ям        еми       .
SFX L   ям        емите     .
SFX L   ям        емия      .
SFX L   ям        емият     .
SFX L   ям        яма       .
SFX L   ям        ямата     .
SFX L   ям        ямо       .
SFX L   ям        ямото     .
SFX L   ян        ени       .
SFX L   ян        ените     .
SFX L   ян        ения      .
SFX L   ян        еният     .
SFX L   ян        яна       .
SFX L   ян        яната     .
SFX L   ян        яно       .
SFX L   ян        яното     .
SFX L   яп        епи       .
SFX L   яп        епите     .
SFX L   яп        епия      .
SFX L   яп        епият     .
SFX L   яп        япа       .
SFX L   яп        япата     .
SFX L   яп        япо       .
SFX L   яп        япото     .
SFX L   ят        ети       .
SFX L   ят        етите     .
SFX L   ят        етия      .
SFX L   ят        етият     .
SFX L   ят        ята       .
SFX L   ят        ятата     .
SFX L   ят        ято       .
SFX L   ят        ятото     .

SFX M Y 29
SFX M   е         а         .
SFX M   е         ата       .
SFX M   е         ето       .
SFX M   ец        еца       .
SFX M   ец        ецо       .
SFX M   ец        ецът      .
SFX M   ец        йци       .
SFX M   ец        йците     .
SFX M   ин        и         .
SFX M   ин        ина       .
SFX M   ин        ино       .
SFX M   ин        инът      .
SFX M   ин        ите       .
SFX M   й         и         .
SFX M   й         ите       .
SFX M   й         ю         .
SFX M   й         я         .
SFX M   й         ят        .
SFX M   о         и         .
SFX M   о         ите       .
SFX M   о         ото       .
SFX M   ъм        ма        .
SFX M   ъм        ми        .
SFX M   ъм        мите      .
SFX M   ъм        мът       .
SFX M   ъм        ъма       .
SFX M   я         и         .
SFX M   я         ите       .
SFX M   я         ята       .

SFX N Y 20
SFX N   ел        ела       .
SFX N   ел        елът      .
SFX N   ел        ли        .
SFX N   ел        лите      .
SFX N   ец        еца       .
SFX N   ец        ецът      .
SFX N   ец        ци        .
SFX N   ец        ците      .
SFX N   ъл        ли        .
SFX N   ъл        лите      .
SFX N   ъл        ъла       .
SFX N   ъл        ълът      .
SFX N   ъм        ми        .
SFX N   ъм        мите      .
SFX N   ъм        ъма       .
SFX N   ъм        ъмът      .
SFX N   ър        ри        .
SFX N   ър        рите      .
SFX N   ър        ъра       .
SFX N   ър        ърът      .
