src/main/resources/bg_BG.dic
автогигант/F
агностицизъм/M
адаш/F
акордьор/F
алгоритъм/N
алкал/C
амплоа/J
анархосиндикализъм/M
ангел/F
ансамбъл/N
аптека/K
асистент/F
асфалт/C
аудиофайл/D
багерист/F
бакалин/M
бардуче/J
барометър/N
баскетбол/I
баща/L
бегач/G
бездържавност/B
безрезултатен/K
безстопанственост/B
безсърдечие/L
безчислен/A
бизнеселит/I
бизнесклиент/C
билборд/D
билкоберач/G
биополе/J
биоритъм/N
благодетел/E
благослов/F
близичък/L
болт/D
бомбе/J
брашненост/B
броец/M
бряз/D
бъзе/J
бързичък/L
бързорък/A
бюджетен/K
вампир/F
вандал/C
варвар/E
ветропоказател/H
вид/D
видеоускорител/H
виме/J
винопроизводство/L
високометър/N
воденичар/E
водоизместимост/B
водохранилище/M
волейбол/I
впряг/D
всмукан/A
встъпление/L
втвърдител/H
въжеиграч/G
възпроизводител/E
възхвала/K
габър/C
газометър/N
гангстер/F
гевезе/J
гланц/D
гласец/I
гнусливост/B
гореказан/A
господ/F
гостилничар/E
готвач/G
гризу/J
грис/D
гроздоберач/G
гръндж/I
гърцизъм/M
гъстообрасъл/L
дамски/K
дебютант/F
девиз/C
демарш/D
демо/J
деятел/E
джентълмен/F
динамичност/B
дипломиран/A
дирижабъл/N
дихател/H
довод/C
доганджия/M
долма/K
досие/J
дост/D
доцент/F
драскач/G
дъждец/I
дължимост/B
дълъг/L
егоист/F
еднокрил/A
еж/D
електротелфер/C
елиминационен/K
елит/I
емпиризъм/M
еньовче/J
жалбоподател/E
жестокосърдечност/B
живец/N
журналист/F
жълтениче/J
завихрител/H
заинтересуван/A
закръгленичък/L
закупвач/G
залесител/E
заместител/H
занемареност/B
звеноводка/K
земемер/C
златотърсач/G
змиеукротител/H
знахар/E
зоб/D
зъбат/A
зърнистост/B
зяпач/G
игрище/M
извозвач/G
излияние/L
изобразител/E
изправител/H
изпращач/G
изсъхналост/B
изток/I
изтриваем/A
изчислител/H
икосаедър/N
имане/JO
имитатор/F
индивидуалист/F
инстанция/K
интербригадир/F
интранет/C
ислям/I
калвинизъм/M
камикадзе/J
кантонер/F
картеч/C
картофче/J
каруцар/E
катерач/G
катетър/N
керамика/K
кеш/I
киноателие/J
кинооператор/F
клерикализъм/M
клинец/N
клокот/C
клонест/A
кметство/L
ковкост/B
код/D
козар/E
коминочистач/G
конкурент/F
контрареволюционер/C
конфузен/K
коритар/E
космос/I
кошче/J
кръвопиец/M
кръжец/I
кръшкач/G
куриоз/F
курсив/C
кюп/D
лавър/N
лампен/A
лапландец/L
легендарен/K
легитимност/B
леке/J
лечител/E
либерализъм/M
лом/D
майор/C
малц/D
маркетинг/I
маслометър/N
маслопоказател/H
математичен/K
махов/A
мебелист/F
медар/E
мениджърство/L
ментърджия/M
мерач/G
методиченост/B
мехлем/C
минотавър/N
мир/I
мишле/J
младеж/G
моментален/K
мочурище/M
муфт/C
мъстител/E
мъхов/A
навременност/B
название/L
натиск/I
научност/B
нацист/F
неведом/A
невротичен/K
недълбок/A
неизброим/A
неизисканост/B
нелек/A
необходим/A
неодобрение/L
неподправеност/B
неправдив/A
неритмичност/B
несинхронизиран/A
неупотреба/K
нечовечност/B
нивопоказател/H
никотинизъм/M
новопосветен/A
оазис/C
обвинител/E
обозрение/L
обтекател/H
озеленител/H
ок/D
октоедър/N
описвач/G
опустошител/E
оргия/K
ориз/I
осветител/H
островче/J
откъслечност/B
отцепничество/L
отчет/C
охладител/H
пазител/E
палец/N
памукоберач/G
панаирджия/M
пек/I
пектин/C
персийка/K
петнист/A
пехливанин/M
питомец/N
плетач/G
плисе/J
повтор/C
погасител/E
подвид/D
подражание/L
подсладител/H
подслушвач/G
покорност/B
покупателка/K
помирител/E
посрещач/G
пощаджия/M
прародител/E
превал/C
превключвател/H
превъзходителство/L
предпазлив/A
предприемач/G
преоценка/K
придан/B
приятничък/L
продавач/G
продължител/H
прозорец/N
профпредседател/E
психофизичен/K
псориазис/I
пул/D
пътеводител/H
пюре/J
радиограф/F
радиотеатър/N
разделител/H
раздразнителност/B
разклонител/H
разкривен/A
разногласие/L
разносвач/G
разпис/C
разширител/H
рахитизъм/M
река/KY
рок/I
роуминг/I
ръб/D
ръководител/E
саламандър/N
самообладание/L
светия/M
свиваемост/B
своенравен/K
северозапад/I
седмаче/J
секач/G
секс/I
серист/C
силикон/I
синхронизиран/A
скиптър/N
слабичък/L
слънце/M
смърч/D
сова/K
спирометър/N
старателност/B
стражар/E
стъклопласт/D
стълбище/M
стълпотворение/L
схоластика/K
събирател/H
таван/C
тактов/A
танцувач/G
театър/N
теле/J
тигър/N
тиролец/L
токоразпределител/H
томбола/K
тон/D
тонер/I
топтанджия/M
тракторист/F
тъжител/E
тъкан/B
търсач/G
уеб/I
унищожител/H
ускорител/H
усмотрение/L
учком/C
факсимиле/J
фар/D
фарисей/M
фланелен/A
фланец/N
харч/D
хидра/K
хлад/I
хлапетия/M
хофмаршал/C
хълмче/J
целеустременост/B
цикъл/N
чарк/D
часовникар/E
четиристаен/L
чобанин/M
шлейф/D
шубе/J
шумозаглушител/H
щангист/F
щипец/N
ядец/I
ядосан/A
яхтклуб/D
